Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 14

Road Planning

54-5-1401. Quarterly Status Report.

The commissioner of transportation shall report quarterly to the state building commission on the status of road projects as approved by the general assembly as part of the department of transportation's budget or otherwise. The status report shall include a current list of projects being planned, projects under construction, and anticipated starting dates for projects not yet underway. In addition, the commissioner shall report other information that may be requested from time to time by the commission.

Acts 1999, ch. 288, § 2.

Collateral References. Highways
1 et seq.

54-5-1402. Right-of-way acquisitions requiring special approval.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, proposed payment shall be approved by the commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury:

If the property is proposed for acquisition for right-of-way under the authority of this chapter;

If:

The appraised value of a parcel of land along the right-of-way exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); or

The appraised value of all parcels of land owned by any one (1) person, family or entity along the right-of-way exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); and

If the department proposes to pay more than ten percent (10%) above the current appraised value.

Acts 1999, ch. 288, § 3.

54-5-851. Purpose.